Utah statutes.
63B-1b-401.   Pledge of agency bonds to pay revenue bonds -- Contents of
financing agreements -- Use of money received by authorizing agencies.
(1)  With the approval of the relevant authorizing agency, the State Bonding
Commission may pledge, assign, or otherwise transfer any agency bonds, any
money payable on or with respect to them, any legally available money or other
security administered by an authorizing agency, or any combination of bonds,
money, or other security to provide for the payment of revenue bonds issued
under Section 63B-1b-402 and the payment of any amounts due under agreements
and contracts described in Subsection 63B-1b-402(9).
(2) (a)  Before issuing revenue bonds under Section 63B-1b-402, the commission
shall enter into a financing agreement with the appropriate authorizing agency
or agencies.
(b)  This agreement shall specify:
(i)  any agency bonds, money, or other security to be pledged by the
commission to provide for the payment of the revenue bonds;
(ii)  the amount to be paid to the order of the authorizing agency or agencies
for the agency bonds, money, or other security; and
(iii)  other matters that the commission considers necessary or appropriate.
(3)  The amounts received by each authorizing agency from the proceeds of the
revenue bonds, together with all amounts paid to the authorizing agencies
pursuant to Subsection 63B-1b-402(10), shall be applied by the authorizing
agency as authorized by the law creating or authorizing the loan or grant
program of the authorizing agency.
